Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 11 Dower And Curtesy
28-11-307. Dower or curtesy when no children.

If a person dies leaving a surviving spouse and no children, the surviving spouse shall be endowed in fee simple of one-half (½) of the real estate of which the deceased person died seized when the estate is a new acquisition and not an ancestral estate and of one-half (½) of the personal estate, absolutely, and in his or her own right, as against collateral heirs.

However, as against creditors, the surviving spouse shall be invested with one-third (1/3) of the real estate in fee simple if a new acquisition, and not ancestral, and of one-third (1/3) of the personal property absolutely.

If the real estate of the deceased person is an ancestral estate, the surviving spouse shall be endowed in a life estate of one-half (½) of the estate as against collateral heirs and one-third (1/3) as against creditors.

Ark. L. Rev.

Domestic Relations — Adoption of Adults, 12 Ark. L. Rev. 199.

Comment, Arkansas Marriage: A Partnership Between a Husband and Wife, or a Safety Net for Support?, 61 Ark. L. Rev. 735.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Arkansas Law Survey, Looney, Decedents' Estates, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 139.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

J. Cliff McKinney, With All My Worldly Goods I Thee Endow: The Law and Statistics of Dower and Curtesy in Arkansas, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 353 (2016).

The operation of the dower provisions under this section, §28-11-201, and §28-11-301 which gave a wife the right of dower which could not be defeated by a husband's conveyance and the comparable curtesy statutes under former §§ 61-228 (repealed) and 61-229 (repealed), which allow a wife to defeat curtesy by conveyance, provided for dissimilar treatment for men and women similarly situated, and since there was no justification for the discrimination, this section and §28-11-201 were held unconstitutional. Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981) (decision under prior law).

This section means that if a husband dies leaving a widow and no direct descendants, the widow will be endowed as provided. Britton v. Oldham, 80 Ark. 252, 96 S.W. 1066 (1906).

The word “children” as used in this section includes all direct descendants. Starrett v. McKim, 90 Ark. 520, 119 S.W. 824 (1909).

Dower in real estate “of which such husband died seized” includes lands sold in lifetime of the husband without wife's consent. Fletcher v. Felker, 97 F. Supp. 755 (W.D. Ark. 1951) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

A widow is not entitled to dower under this section where there are surviving adopted children. Sanders v. Taylor, 193 Ark. 1095, 104 S.W.2d 797 (1937).

Where a widow has, under this section, become entitled to one-half of the realty of which her husband died seized, and dies herself, her heirs and his heirs become tenants in common and hold the land as such. Avera v. Banks, 168 Ark. 718, 271 S.W. 970 (1925).

The act of 1891 amending this section did not amend, repeal, or in any manner impair §28-11-201 or28-11-301. Roetzel v. Beal, 196 Ark. 5, 116 S.W.2d 591 (1938).

A widow is entitled to one-half the estate as against collateral heirs even though all the remainder of the estate is needed to pay debts, and if more than half the estate is needed to pay debts, the widow, as against the collateral heirs, is entitled to the remainder. Whitener v. Whitener, 227 Ark. 1038, 304 S.W.2d 260 (1957).

A wife does not have dower interest in land to which her husband has equitable title if he transfers the land prior to his death. Fletcher v. Felker, 97 F. Supp. 755 (W.D. Ark. 1951).

Where husband entered into a contract to sell land to which he held the equitable title, and thereafter pursuant to the agreement the parties holding the legal title transferred the land to husband, wife did not hold dower in the land, since the husband acquired no beneficial interest in the land as it was subject to a contract to convey. Fletcher v. Felker, 97 F. Supp. 755 (W.D. Ark. 1951).

Bankruptcy debtor husband properly claimed an exemption in his curtesy interest in the co-debtor wife's real properties that the wife inherited from a parent; the husband's inchoate interest in the ancestral properties, which was in the nature of a life estate rather than a fee simple estate, was property of the husband's bankruptcy estate.In re Tankersley, 575 B.R. 848 (Bankr. E.D. Ark. 2017).

Endowment is not subject to the inheritance tax law. McDaniel v. Byrkett, 120 Ark. 295, 179 S.W. 491 (1915).

The widow of one who died childless holding part of the fee simple title to land by inheritance and part by deed from one of his co-heirs held the land partly as unassigned dower and partly as tenant in common with the other heirs, and her holding possession of the land and paying the taxes on it could not be adverse to the interests of the other heirs or their grantees. Head v. Farnum, 244 Ark. 367, 425 S.W.2d 303 (1968).

The sale of a husband's land during his lifetime under execution against him does not defeat the claim of his widow, within seven years of his death, to her dower interest therein. Roetzel v. Beal, 196 Ark. 5, 116 S.W.2d 591 (1938).

Where husband's land was sold under execution against him and there were no children or creditors, the widow was entitled to be endowed in fee simple of one-half of the realty sold at the execution sale. Roetzel v. Beal, 196 Ark. 5, 116 S.W.2d 591 (1938).

The interest of a widow in leases on her husband's real estate is an estate in land and not a chattel interest. Brack v. Coburn, 210 Ark. 334, 196 S.W.2d 230 (1946).

Equity will decree a reformation for mistake in settlement between parties who were ignorant of provisions of this section. Terry v. Logue, 75 Ark. 240, 87 S.W. 119 (1905).

Where a probate court, acting on the theory that there are no debts, assigns one-half of the homestead of a decedent to his widow in fee and the other half as dower, and subsequently creditors appear, she will, in the absence of a showing in the record to the contrary, be held not to have waived her homestead rights. Robertson v. Adams, 163 Ark. 290, 260 S.W. 37 (1924).

Where commissioners had recommended, without explanation, that ancestral estates be assigned to the wife in fee, the confirmation by the court could be set aside at instance of collateral heirs. Browning v. Berg, 196 Ark. 595, 118 S.W.2d 1017 (1938).

Where a father, in consideration of the assumption by his son of a portion of a mortgage, conveyed certain lands to his son, the grant became, in the son, a new acquisition, and there being no children, his widow's dower was in fee. Beard v. Beard, 148 Ark. 29, 228 S.W. 734 (1921).

The widow of a deceased husband takes one-half of his lands which are new acquisitions in fee simple. Wilson v. Biles, 171 Ark. 912, 287 S.W. 373 (1926).

Where a husband dies childless, his widow's dower in a new acquisition is one-half thereof which passes to her, while the other one-half passes to his collateral heirs subject to her right of homestead. Smith v. Goldby, 172 Ark. 549, 289 S.W. 780 (1927).

Where a married son dies leaving lands as a new acquisition and no children or creditors, his father and his widow each takes a half interest therein in fee. Tandy v. Smith, 173 Ark. 828, 293 S.W. 735 (1927).

A testator's widow not divorced, though a suit for that purpose was pending, is entitled to one-half of his personal estate, there being no children, and a specific legacy of money in a bank is to be included in arriving at her share. Holcomb v. Mullin, 167 Ark. 622, 268 S.W. 32 (1925).

Although a bankruptcy debtor's recognizable, inchoate dower interest in her husband's real property was property of the debtor's bankruptcy estate, the property was not subject to turnover under 11 U.S.C.S. § 542 due to the debtor's legal inability to transfer the interest to anyone other than the husband's grantee. In re Flippin, 334 B.R. 434 (Bankr. W.D. Ark. 2005), modified, Clark v. Flippin, — F. Supp. 2d —, 2006 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 71739 (W.D. Ark. Sept. 29, 2006).

Bankruptcy court correctly held that, although a debtor's dower interest was property of the bankruptcy estate, it could not be conveyed and, because the interest was not one which was transferable, it was not subject to turnover under 11 U.S.C.S. § 542(a). Clark v. Flippin, — F. Supp. 2d —, 2006 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 71739 (W.D. Ark. Sept. 29, 2006).

There must have been actual corporeal seizen in the husband during coverture; therefore, dower will not attach to realty in which he had only a remainder or reversion. McGuire v. Cook, 98 Ark. 118, 135 S.W. 840 (1911).

A widow has an interest in real estate of which her husband died seized, which, so far as the wife's dower is concerned, includes lands sold in the lifetime of the husband without her consent in legal form against all creditors of the estate. Roetzel v. Beal, 196 Ark. 5, 116 S.W.2d 591 (1938).

Possession by tenant of leased land is possession of landlord. Brack v. Coburn, 210 Ark. 334, 196 S.W.2d 230 (1946).

If father dies leaving a widow, a married son, and three other children, and children do not live on the land after the death of the father, and married son dies before his mother, leaving a widow, the widow of married son is not entitled to dower, as her husband did not die seized of an estate of inheritance. Maloney v. McCullough, 215 Ark. 570, 221 S.W.2d 770 (1949).

Where a husband dies leaving lands, not ancestral, and there are neither debts nor children, his widow is entitled to one-half thereof in fee simple, though there was a separation agreement between them which, however, had been annulled by their subsequently living together as husband and wife. Sherman v. Sherman, 159 Ark. 364, 252 S.W. 27 (1923).

The widow's interest vests in her immediately on the husband's death and will descend to her heirs. Barton v. Wilson, 116 Ark. 400, 172 S.W. 1032 (Ark. 1915).

No adjudication of a court is necessary. Kendall v. Crenshaw, 116 Ark. 427, 173 S.W. 393 (1915).

The estate becomes vested immediately upon a husband's death, but it does not vest in severalty until it is assigned to the widow. Arbaugh v. West, 127 Ark. 98, 192 S.W. 171 (1917).

Dower interest of a widow vests immediately upon death of her husband, but dower interest does not vest if husband does not die seized of property. Maloney v. McCullough, 215 Ark. 570, 221 S.W.2d 770 (1949).

Where a father died intestate and his son was appointed administrator but died intestate and without surviving issue before expiration of time for filing claims against father's estate and without ever having taken charge of the real estate of the father's estate, and the debts of the father's estate were all paid from the personalty, the widow of the son was entitled to dower in her husband's interest in the lands of his father, under provisions of this section, since her husband died seized of the lands. Pfaff v. Heizman, 218 Ark. 201, 235 S.W.2d 551, 23 A.L.R.2d 957 (1951).

Cited: Thomas v. Langley, 200 Ark. 220, 138 S.W.2d 380 (1940); Howze v. Hutchens, 213 Ark. 52, 209 S.W.2d 286 (1948); Daniels v. Johnson, 216 Ark. 374, 226 S.W.2d 571, 15 A.L.R.2d 1401 (1950); Harbour v. Sheffield, 269 Ark. 932, 601 S.W.2d 595 (Ct. App. 1980); Heath v. Clear, 280 Ark. 482, 659 S.W.2d 504 (1983).

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Any pecuniary provision that shall be made for the benefit of an intended spouse, and in lieu of dower or curtesy, if assented to by the intended spouse, as provided in this section, shall be a bar to any right or claim of dower or curtesy of the spouse in all lands of his or her spouse.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

J. Cliff McKinney, With All My Worldly Goods I Thee Endow: The Law and Statistics of Dower and Curtesy in Arkansas, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 353 (2016).

An antenuptial agreement between husband and wife that the wife shall take a child's part in her husband's estate, except as to the homestead, being intended in lieu of dower, though not a technical jointure, will be deemed an equitable jointure. Comstock v. Comstock, 146 Ark. 266, 225 S.W. 621 (1920).

Jointure bars dower, and the right to possession of a jointure accrues upon the husband's death. Bryan v. Bryan, 62 Ark. 79, 34 S.W. 260 (1896).

A wife cannot claim dower in her deceased husband's lands where she agreed to a separation from him and accepted a deed to certain lands in lieu of dower. McGaugh v. Mathis, 131 Ark. 221, 198 S.W. 1147 (1917).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 21; Acts 1891, No. 65, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 3536; Pope's Dig., § 4421; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-206.

Subchapter 4

— Provisions in Lieu of Dower or Curtesy

28-11-401. Jointure or payment with spouse's assent.

When an estate in land shall be conveyed to a person and his or her intended spouse, or to the intended spouse alone, or to any person in trust for the person and his or her intended spouse, or in trust for the spouse alone, for the purpose of erecting a jointure for the intended spouse, and with his or her assent, the jointure shall be a bar to any right or claim for dower or curtesy of the spouse in any land of the other spouse.

The assent of the spouse to the jointure shall be evinced, if he or she is of full age, by his or her becoming a party to the conveyance by which it shall be settled or, if the spouse is an infant, by his or her joining with his or her father or guardian in the conveyance.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, §§ 9-11; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3522-3524; Pope's Dig., §§ 4406-4408; Acts 1981, No. 714, §§ 31-33; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 61-214 — 61-216.

28-11-402. Jointure or payment — Election of spouse.

If, before the marriage, but without a spouse's assent, or if, after the marriage, land shall be given or assured for the jointure of a spouse or a pecuniary provision shall be made for the spouse in lieu of dower or curtesy, the spouse shall make an election whether the spouse will take the jointure or pecuniary provision, or whether the spouse will be endowed of the lands of the other spouse. However, the spouse shall not be entitled to both.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 12; C. & M. Dig., § 3525; Pope's Dig., § 4409; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 34; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-217.

28-11-403. Devise or bequest — Election of spouse.

If land is devised to a spouse, or a pecuniary or other provision is made for a spouse by will in lieu of dower or curtesy, the spouse shall make an election whether he or she will take the land so devised, or the provision so made, or whether he or she will be endowed of the lands of the other spouse.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 13; C. & M. Dig., § 3526; Pope's Dig., § 4410; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 35; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-218.

28-11-404. Devise deemed in lieu of dower or curtesy.

If any spouse shall devise and bequeath to the other spouse any portion of his or her real estate of which he or she died seized, it shall be deemed and taken in lieu of dower or curtesy, as the case may be, out of the estate of the deceased spouse, unless the testator shall, in his or her will, declare otherwise.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 23; C. & M. Dig., § 3538; Pope's Dig., § 4424; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 37; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-221.

28-11-405. Forfeiture.

Every jointure, devise, and pecuniary provision, in lieu of dower or curtesy, shall be forfeited by the spouse for whose benefit it shall be made, in the same cases in which the spouse would forfeit his or her dower or curtesy, as the case may be. Upon such a forfeiture, any estate so conveyed for jointure and every pecuniary provision so made shall immediately vest in the person, or his or her legal representatives, in whom they would have vested on the determination of the spouse's interest therein by the death of the spouse.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 52, § 15; C. & M. Dig., § 3528; Pope's Dig., § 4412; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 36; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-220.